Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1950
Delegates.

(a) A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

(b) The articles or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

(1) The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates including their selection and removal;

(2) Calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

(3) Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 50.